Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.100

Meetings—Notice.

The commission shall hold regular meetings, at least quarterly, with the time and date thereof to be fixed by resolution of the commission.

The commission shall hold an annual meeting. The proposed budget shall be presented for discussion at the meeting. Notice of the annual meeting shall be given by the commission at least ten days prior to the meeting by public notice of such meeting published in newspapers of general circulation in the state of Washington, by radio and press releases and through trade publications.

The commission shall establish by resolution, the time, place and manner of calling special meetings of the commission with reasonable notice to the members: PROVIDED, That, the notice of any special meeting may be waived by a waiver thereof by each member of the commission.

[ 2000 c 146 s 3; 1969 c 133 s 9.]